New York, session 2025-2026, S5190.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 352 of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 13 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. The state university shall consist of the four university centers 5 at Albany, Binghamton, Buffalo and Stony Brook, the designated colleges 6 of arts and sciences at Brockport, Buffalo, Cortland, Fredonia, Geneseo, 7 New Paltz, Old Westbury, Oneonta, Oswego, Plattsburgh, Potsdam and 8 Purchase, the college of engineering and applied sciences at Yonkers, 9 empire state college, the agricultural and technical colleges at Alfred, 10 Canton, Cobleskill, Delhi, Farmingdale and Morrisville, downstate 11 medical center, upstate medical center, the college of optometry, the 12 college of environmental science and forestry, maritime college, the 13 college of technology at Utica/Rome, the statutory or contract colleges 14 at Cornell university and Alfred university, and such additional univer- 15 sities, colleges and other institutions, facilities and research centers 16 as have been or hereafter may be acquired, established, operated or 17 contracted to be operated for the state by the state university trus- 18 tees. 19 § 2. (a) The trustees of the state university of New York are hereby 20 authorized and directed to immediately take all actions to create and 21 establish within the state university system, and subject to the juris- 22 diction of such board of trustees, a college of engineering and applied 23 sciences as a four-year state university of New York in the city of 24 Yonkers, county of Westchester. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01363-01-5 S. 5190 2 1 (b) The board of trustees of the state university shall select the 2 location of such college within the city of Yonkers and provide for such 3 college to be an accessible, affordable, competitive, four-year, bach- 4 elor's level, degree-granting college of the state university. 5 (c) The purpose of this college of engineering and applied sciences 6 shall be to offer majors in industrial/manufacturing, engineering and 7 technology, transportation engineering and technology, computer engi- 8 neering and technology, telecommunications engineering and technology, 9 environmental engineering and technology, biomedical engineering and 10 technology, civil engineering and technology and the history of econom- 11 ics of science and technology. 12 (d) The board of trustees of the state university of New York shall 13 conduct all the duties required under article 8 of the education law 14 upon the establishment of the state university of New York college of 15 engineering and applied sciences at Yonkers, establish a master plan, 16 establish standards and promulgate any necessary rules and regulations 17 for the establishment of such college. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.